North Carolina, session 2025, SB217.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Durham County for the repair
and improvement of various orphan roads in non-municipal areas of the County, which would
allow the North Carolina Department of Transportation to accept these roads for State
maintenance.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S217-v-1*